Maryland, session 2025, SB0293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–129.
(a) (1) The Department shall develop guidelines for an antibias training
program for school employees.
(2) The guidelines developed under this subsection shall:
(i) Be inclusive;
(ii) Incorporate lessons in cultural awareness;
(iii) Aim to reduce implicit bias;
(iv) Be culturally responsive to the needs of educators and students;
(v) Raise awareness of biases, prejudices, intolerances, and
discrimination faced by African Americans, Native Americans, Asian Americans and
Pacific Islanders, Hispanic Americans, and other historically marginalized racial and
ethnic minorities;
(vi) Combat prejudices faced by historically marginalized religious
minorities, including antisemitism and Islamophobia;
– 1 –

Ch. 302 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vii) Seek to achieve schools that are more inclusive and tolerant of
students, faculty, and staff regardless of an individual’s race, national origin, marital
status, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, ancestry, physical attributes,
socioeconomic status, familial status, or disability; and
(viii) Be evidence–based.
(3) In developing the guidelines, the Department shall incorporate lessons
learned from real life incidents of discriminatory bullying, harassment, or intimidation
reported in accordance with § 7–424 of this article.
(4) The Department periodically shall update the guidelines required
under this subsection.
(b) (1) Each county board shall, in consultation with teachers and other public
school employees, develop an antibias training based on the guidelines developed under
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If the county board has an antibias training in place before the
Department issues its guidelines, the county board shall, in consultation with teachers and
other public school employees, update its training to incorporate the practices identified in
the guidelines.
(c) (1) Every other year, each county board shall train each public school
employee whose job duties include frequent interaction with students using its antibias
training.
(2) Antibias training shall be job–embedded, paid professional
development training that is provided during nonteaching time.
(3) To the extent practicable, the training shall:
(i) Be offered in a peer–to–peer setting;
(ii) Take a half day or less to complete; and
(iii) Incorporate lessons learned from incidents of bullying,
harassment, or intimidation in the county, reported in accordance with § 7–424 of this
article.
(D) (1) AT LEAST ONCE DURING THE MEMBER’S TERM, EACH MEMBER OF
A COUNTY BOARD SHALL COMPLETE THE ANTIBIAS TRAINING DEVELOPED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 302
(2) THE TRAINING SHALL BE CONDUCTED SEPARATELY FROM THE
PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –